Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LABOR MARKET INFORMATION.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the publication, dissemination, and use of labor market information under Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.401. new text end